Utah statutes.
63C-11-306.   Club fighting prohibited.

(1)  Club fighting is prohibited.

(2)  Any person who publicizes, promotes, conducts, or engages in a club fighting match is:

(a)  guilty of a class A misdemeanor as provided in Section 76-9-705; and

(b)  subject to license revocation under this chapter.

